Massachusetts, session 194th, H2295.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Subsection (c) of section 3A of chapter 40A of the General Laws, as appearing in the
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding at the end thereof the following words: -
; provided that said guidelines shall include criteria requiring that the total net units of
housing created by qualifying construction projects completed within the past 3 years since the
effective date of this section be taken into consideration when determining if an MBTA
community is in compliance.
of 1